Utah statutes.
76-6a-6.   Rights of persons giving consideration in scheme.

(1) Any person giving consideration in connection with a pyramid scheme may, notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary, declare his giving of consideration and the related sale or contract for sale void, and may bring a court action to recover the consideration.  In the action, the court shall, in addition to any judgment awarded to the plaintiff, require the defendant to pay to the plaintiff interest as provided in Section 15-1-4, reasonable attorneys' fees, and the costs of the action reduced by any compensation paid by the defendant to the plaintiff in connection with the pyramid scheme.

(2)  The rights, remedies, and penalties provided in this chapter are independent of and supplemental to each other and to any other right, remedy or penalty available in law or equity. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to diminish or abrogate any other right, remedy or penalty.

